Utah statutes.
17B-1-623.   Emergency expenditures.

The board of trustees of a local district may, by resolution, amend a budget and authorize an expenditure of money that results in a deficit in the district's general fund balance if:

(1)  the board determines that:

(a)  an emergency exists; and

(b)  the expenditure is reasonably necessary to meet the emergency; and

(2)  the expenditure is used to meet the emergency.

